Missouri, session 2026, SB1661.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 301.010, RSMo, is repealed and five
2 new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
3 144.465, 301.010, 301.092, 301.093, and 301.094, to read as
4 follows:
1 144.465. 1. The dates from August 28, 2026, to
2 December 1, 2026, shall be designated as an "amnesty period"
3 for taxpayers in this state who did not pay state and local
4 taxes as outlined in sections 301.092 to 301.094 and who
5 titled and registered their motor vehicle, recreational
6 vehicle or any other vehicle in another state and such
7 vehicle, under sections 301.092 to 301.094, would have been
8 required to have been titled and registered in the state of
9 Missouri and who are delinquent in taxes and other
10 liabilities to the department of revenue arising from the
11 purchases of said vehicles. Notwithstanding any provisions
12 of law to the contrary, with respect to all associated late
13 fees and penalties administered by the department of
14 revenue, a taxpayer shall be granted full amnesty from the
15 assessment or payment of all such late fees and penalties
16 provided that the liabilities have arisen from a motor
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1661 2
17 vehicle purchase completed before August 28, 2026, and the
18 taxpayer completes and submits a written application for
19 such amnesty to the department of revenue during the amnesty
20 period. The department of revenue shall be responsible for
21 designing and publishing a written application for this
22 amnesty program not less than thirty days before the
23 beginning of this amnesty period.
24 2. The department of revenue shall issue a certificate
25 of title and registration eligibility to each eligible
26 taxpayer who submits a completed application during the
27 amnesty period. The certificate shall verify that the
28 taxpayer has been granted amnesty for all late fees and
29 penalties described in subsection 1 of this section.
30 3. Upon the granting of amnesty to an eligible
31 taxpayer under the provisions of this section, the
32 department of revenue shall facilitate the issuance of all
33 related documentation and materials including, but not
34 limited to, motor vehicle title and registration, valid
35 license plates, and license plate tabs to such taxpayer.
36 The department of revenue shall develop a standardized
37 procedure to ensure that all eligible taxpayers who receive
38 a certificate of eligibility under subsection 2 of this
39 section are able to receive related documentation and
40 materials in a timely manner.
1 301.010. As used in this chapter and sections 304.010
2 to 304.040, 304.120 to 304.260, and sections 307.010 to
3 307.175, the following terms mean:
4 (1) "All-terrain vehicle", any motorized vehicle
5 manufactured and used exclusively for off-highway use, with
6 an unladen dry weight of one thousand five hundred pounds or
7 less, traveling on three, four or more nonhighway tires,
8 with either:

SB 1661 3
9 (a) A seat designed to be straddled by the operator,
10 and handlebars for steering control, but excluding an
11 electric bicycle; or
12 (b) A width of fifty inches or less, measured from
13 outside of tire rim to outside of tire rim, regardless of
14 seating or steering arrangement;
15 (2) "Autocycle", a three-wheeled motor vehicle which
16 the drivers and passengers ride in a partially or completely
17 enclosed nonstraddle seating area, that is designed to be
18 controlled with a steering wheel and pedals, and that has
19 met applicable Department of Transportation National Highway
20 Traffic Safety Administration requirements or federal
21 motorcycle safety standards;
22 (3) "Automobile transporter", any vehicle combination
23 capable of carrying cargo on the power unit and designed and
24 used for the transport of assembled motor vehicles,
25 including truck camper units;
26 (4) "Axle load", the total load transmitted to the
27 road by all wheels whose centers are included between two
28 parallel transverse vertical planes forty inches apart,
29 extending across the full width of the vehicle;
30 (5) "Backhaul", the return trip of a vehicle
31 transporting cargo or general freight, especially when
32 carrying goods back over all or part of the same route;
33 (6) "Boat transporter", any vehicle combination
34 capable of carrying cargo on the power unit and designed and
35 used specifically to transport assembled boats and boat
36 hulls. Boats may be partially disassembled to facilitate
37 transporting;
38 (7) "Body shop", a business that repairs physical
39 damage on motor vehicles that are not owned by the shop or

SB 1661 4
40 its officers or employees by mending, straightening,
41 replacing body parts, or painting;
42 (8) "Bus", a motor vehicle primarily for the
43 transportation of a driver and eight or more passengers but
44 not including shuttle buses;
45 (9) "Commercial motor vehicle", a motor vehicle
46 designed or regularly used for carrying freight and
47 merchandise, or more than eight passengers but not including
48 vanpools or shuttle buses;
49 (10) "Cotton trailer", a trailer designed for
50 transporting cotton at speeds less than seventy miles per
51 hour from field to field or from field to market and return;
52 (11) "Dealer", any person, firm, corporation,
53 association, agent or subagent engaged in the sale or
54 exchange of new, used or reconstructed motor vehicles or
55 trailers;
56 (12) "Director" or "director of revenue", the director
57 of the department of revenue;
58 (13) "Driveaway operation":
59 (a) The movement of a motor vehicle or trailer by any
60 person or motor carrier other than a dealer over any public
61 highway, under its own power singly, or in a fixed
62 combination of two or more vehicles, for the purpose of
63 delivery for sale or for delivery either before or after
64 sale;
65 (b) The movement of any vehicle or vehicles, not owned
66 by the transporter, constituting the commodity being
67 transported, by a person engaged in the business of
68 furnishing drivers and operators for the purpose of
69 transporting vehicles in transit from one place to another
70 by the driveaway or towaway methods; or

SB 1661 5
71 (c) The movement of a motor vehicle by any person who
72 is lawfully engaged in the business of transporting or
73 delivering vehicles that are not the person's own and
74 vehicles of a type otherwise required to be registered, by
75 the driveaway or towaway methods, from a point of
76 manufacture, assembly or distribution or from the owner of
77 the vehicles to a dealer or sales agent of a manufacturer or
78 to any consignee designated by the shipper or consignor;
79 (14) "Dromedary", a box, deck, or plate mounted behind
80 the cab and forward of the fifth wheel on the frame of the
81 power unit of a truck tractor-semitrailer combination. A
82 truck tractor equipped with a dromedary may carry part of a
83 load when operating independently or in a combination with a
84 semitrailer;
85 (15) "Electric bicycle", a bicycle equipped with fully
86 operable pedals, a saddle or seat for the rider, and an
87 electric motor of less than 750 watts that meets the
88 requirements of one of the following three classes:
89 (a) "Class 1 electric bicycle", an electric bicycle
90 equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the
91 rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when
92 the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour;
93 (b) "Class 2 electric bicycle", an electric bicycle
94 equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel
95 the bicycle and that is not capable of providing assistance
96 when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour;
97 or
98 (c) "Class 3 electric bicycle", an electric bicycle
99 equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the
100 rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when
101 the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour;

SB 1661 6
102 (16) "Farm tractor", a tractor used exclusively for
103 agricultural purposes;
104 (17) "Fleet", any group of ten or more motor vehicles
105 owned by the same owner;
106 (18) "Fleet vehicle", a motor vehicle which is
107 included as part of a fleet;
108 (19) "Fullmount", a vehicle mounted completely on the
109 frame of either the first or last vehicle in a saddlemount
110 combination;
111 (20) "Gross weight", the weight of vehicle and/or
112 vehicle combination without load, plus the weight of any
113 load thereon;
114 (21) "Hail-damaged vehicle", any vehicle, the body of
115 which has become dented as the result of the impact of hail;
116 (22) "Highway", any public thoroughfare for vehicles,
117 including state roads, county roads and public streets,
118 avenues, boulevards, parkways or alleys in any municipality;
119 (23) "Improved highway", a highway which has been
120 paved with gravel, macadam, concrete, brick or asphalt, or
121 surfaced in such a manner that it shall have a hard, smooth
122 surface;
123 (24) "Intersecting highway", any highway which joins
124 another, whether or not it crosses the same;
125 (25) "Junk vehicle", a vehicle which:
126 (a) Is incapable of operation or use upon the highways
127 and has no resale value except as a source of parts or
128 scrap; or
129 (b) Has been designated as junk or a substantially
130 equivalent designation by this state or any other state;
131 (26) "Kit vehicle", a motor vehicle assembled by a
132 person other than a generally recognized manufacturer of
133 motor vehicles by the use of a glider kit or replica

SB 1661 7
134 purchased from an authorized manufacturer and accompanied by
135 a manufacturer's statement of origin;
136 (27) "Land improvement contractors' commercial motor
137 vehicle", any not-for-hire commercial motor vehicle the
138 operation of which is confined to:
139 (a) An area that extends not more than a radius of one
140 hundred fifty miles from its home base of operations when
141 transporting its owner's machinery, equipment, or auxiliary
142 supplies to or from projects involving soil and water
143 conservation, or to and from equipment dealers' maintenance
144 facilities for maintenance purposes; or
145 (b) An area that extends not more than a radius of
146 fifty miles from its home base of operations when
147 transporting its owner's machinery, equipment, or auxiliary
148 supplies to or from projects not involving soil and water
149 conservation.
150 Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prevent
151 any motor vehicle from being registered as a commercial
152 motor vehicle or local commercial motor vehicle;
153 (28) "Local commercial motor vehicle", a commercial
154 motor vehicle whose operations are confined to a
155 municipality and that area extending not more than fifty
156 miles therefrom, or a commercial motor vehicle whose
157 property-carrying operations are confined solely to the
158 transportation of property owned by any person who is the
159 owner or operator of such vehicle to or from a farm owned by
160 such person or under the person's control by virtue of a
161 landlord and tenant lease; provided that any such property
162 transported to any such farm is for use in the operation of
163 such farm;

SB 1661 8
164 (29) "Local log truck", a commercial motor vehicle
165 which is registered pursuant to this chapter to operate as a
166 motor vehicle on the public highways of this state; used
167 exclusively in this state; used to transport harvested
168 forest products; operated solely at a forested site and in
169 an area extending not more than a one hundred fifty mile
170 radius from such site; and when operated on the national
171 system of interstate and defense highways described in 23
172 U.S.C. Section 103, as amended, or outside the one hundred
173 fifty mile radius from such site with an extended distance
174 local log truck permit, does not have more than four axles,
175 and does not pull a trailer which has more than three
176 axles. Harvesting equipment which is used specifically for
177 cutting, felling, trimming, delimbing, debarking, chipping,
178 skidding, loading, unloading, and stacking may be
179 transported on a local log truck;
180 (30) "Local log truck tractor", a commercial motor
181 vehicle which is registered under this chapter to operate as
182 a motor vehicle on the public highways of this state; used
183 exclusively in this state; used to transport harvested
184 forest products, operated at a forested site and in an area
185 extending not more than a one hundred fifty mile radius from
186 such site; and when operated on the national system of
187 interstate and defense highways described in 23 U.S.C.
188 Section 103, as amended, or outside the one hundred fifty
189 mile radius from such site with an extended distance local
190 log truck permit, does not have more than three axles and
191 does not pull a trailer which has more than three axles;
192 (31) "Local transit bus", a bus whose operations are
193 confined wholly within a municipal corporation, or wholly
194 within a municipal corporation and a commercial zone, as
195 defined in section 390.020, adjacent thereto, forming a part

SB 1661 9
196 of a public transportation system within such municipal
197 corporation and such municipal corporation and adjacent
198 commercial zone;
199 (32) "Log truck", a vehicle which is not a local log
200 truck or local log truck tractor and is used exclusively to
201 transport harvested forest products to and from forested
202 sites which is registered pursuant to this chapter to
203 operate as a motor vehicle on the public highways of this
204 state for the transportation of harvested forest products;
205 (33) "Major component parts", the rear clip, cowl,
206 frame, body, cab, front-end assembly, and front clip, as
207 those terms are defined by the director of revenue pursuant
208 to rules and regulations or by illustrations;
209 (34) "Manufacturer", any person, firm, corporation or
210 association engaged in the business of manufacturing or
211 assembling motor vehicles, trailers or vessels for sale;
212 (35) "Motor change vehicle", a vehicle manufactured
213 prior to August, 1957, which receives a new, rebuilt or used
214 engine, and which used the number stamped on the original
215 engine as the vehicle identification number;
216 (36) "Motor vehicle", any self-propelled vehicle not
217 operated exclusively upon tracks, except farm tractors and
218 electric bicycles;
219 (37) "Motor vehicle primarily for business use", any
220 vehicle other than a recreational motor vehicle, motorcycle,
221 motortricycle, or any commercial motor vehicle licensed for
222 over twelve thousand pounds:
223 (a) Offered for hire or lease; or
224 (b) The owner of which also owns ten or more such
225 motor vehicles;
226 (38) "Motorcycle", a motor vehicle operated on two
227 wheels;

SB 1661 10
228 (39) "Motorized bicycle", any two-wheeled or three-
229 wheeled device having an automatic transmission and a motor
230 with a cylinder capacity of not more than fifty cubic
231 centimeters, which produces less than three gross brake
232 horsepower, and is capable of propelling the device at a
233 maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour on
234 level ground, but excluding an electric bicycle;
235 (40) "Motortricycle", a motor vehicle upon which the
236 operator straddles or sits astride that is designed to be
237 controlled by handle bars and is operated on three wheels,
238 including a motorcycle while operated with any conveyance,
239 temporary or otherwise, requiring the use of a third wheel,
240 but excluding an electric bicycle. A motortricycle shall
241 not be included in the definition of all-terrain vehicle;
242 (41) "Municipality", any city, town or village,
243 whether incorporated or not;
244 (42) "Nonresident", a resident of a state or country
245 other than the state of Missouri;
246 (43) "Non-USA-std motor vehicle", a motor vehicle not
247 originally manufactured in compliance with United States
248 emissions or safety standards;
249 (44) "Operator", any person who operates or drives a
250 motor vehicle;
251 (45) "Owner", any person, firm, corporation or
252 association, who holds the legal title to a vehicle or who
253 has executed a buyer's order or retail installment sales
254 contract with a motor vehicle dealer licensed under sections
255 301.550 to 301.580 for the purchase of a vehicle with an
256 immediate right of possession vested in the transferee, or
257 in the event a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for
258 the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of
259 purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the

SB 1661 11
260 agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested
261 in the conditional vendee or lessee, or in the event a
262 mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such
263 conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed
264 the owner;
265 (46) "Public garage", a place of business where motor
266 vehicles are housed, stored, repaired, reconstructed or
267 repainted for persons other than the owners or operators of
268 such place of business;
269 (47) "Rebuilder", a business that repairs or rebuilds
270 motor vehicles owned by the rebuilder, but does not include
271 certificated common or contract carriers of persons or
272 property;
273 (48) "Reconstructed motor vehicle", a vehicle that is
274 altered from its original construction by the addition or
275 substitution of two or more new or used major component
276 parts, excluding motor vehicles made from all new parts, and
277 new multistage manufactured vehicles;
278 (49) "Recreational motor vehicle", any motor vehicle
279 designed, constructed or substantially modified so that it
280 may be used and is used for the purposes of temporary
281 housing quarters, including therein sleeping and eating
282 facilities which are either permanently attached to the
283 motor vehicle or attached to a unit which is securely
284 attached to the motor vehicle. Nothing herein shall prevent
285 any motor vehicle from being registered as a commercial
286 motor vehicle if the motor vehicle could otherwise be so
287 registered;
288 (50) "Recreational off-highway vehicle", any motorized
289 vehicle manufactured and used exclusively for off-highway
290 use which is more than fifty inches but no more than eighty
291 inches in width, measured from outside of tire rim to

SB 1661 12
292 outside of tire rim, with an unladen dry weight of three
293 thousand five hundred pounds or less, traveling on four or
294 more nonhighway tires and which may have access to ATV
295 trails;
296 (51) "Recreational trailer", any trailer designed,
297 constructed, or substantially modified so that it may be
298 used and is used for the purpose of temporary housing
299 quarters, including therein sleeping or eating facilities,
300 which can be temporarily attached to a motor vehicle or
301 attached to a unit which is securely attached to a motor
302 vehicle;
303 (52) "Residence address", "residence", or "resident
304 address", the location at which a person has been physically
305 present for an aggregated period of six months or more
306 during any calendar year and that the person regards as
307 home. A residence address is a person's true, fixed,
308 principal, and permanent home, to which a person intends to
309 return and remain, even though currently residing elsewhere;
310 (53) "Resident", a person who declares himself or
311 herself to be a resident of Missouri for the purpose of
312 obtaining a Missouri driver's license by showing proof of
313 residency as defined in section 302.171 and as a resident of
314 the state to obtain privileges not ordinarily extended to
315 nonresidents including, but not limited to, going to school
316 or placing children in school without paying nonresident
317 tuition or fees;
318 (54) "Rollback or car carrier", any vehicle
319 specifically designed to transport wrecked, disabled or
320 otherwise inoperable vehicles, when the transportation is
321 directly connected to a wrecker or towing service;
322 [(53)] (55) "Saddlemount combination", a combination
323 of vehicles in which a truck or truck tractor tows one or

SB 1661 13
324 more trucks or truck tractors, each connected by a saddle to
325 the frame or fifth wheel of the vehicle in front of it. The
326 "saddle" is a mechanism that connects the front axle of the
327 towed vehicle to the frame or fifth wheel of the vehicle in
328 front and functions like a fifth wheel kingpin connection.
329 When two vehicles are towed in this manner the combination
330 is called a "double saddlemount combination". When three
331 vehicles are towed in this manner, the combination is called
332 a "triple saddlemount combination";
333 [(54)] (56) "Salvage dealer and dismantler", a
334 business that dismantles used motor vehicles for the sale of
335 the parts thereof, and buys and sells used motor vehicle
336 parts and accessories;
337 [(55)] (57) "Salvage vehicle", a motor vehicle,
338 semitrailer, or house trailer which:
339 (a) Was damaged during a year that is no more than six
340 years after the manufacturer's model year designation for
341 such vehicle to the extent that the total cost of repairs to
342 rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its condition
343 immediately before it was damaged for legal operation on the
344 roads or highways exceeds eighty percent of the fair market
345 value of the vehicle immediately preceding the time it was
346 damaged;
347 (b) By reason of condition or circumstance, has been
348 declared salvage, either by its owner, or by a person, firm,
349 corporation, or other legal entity exercising the right of
350 security interest in it;
351 (c) Has been declared salvage by an insurance company
352 as a result of settlement of a claim;
353 (d) Ownership of which is evidenced by a salvage
354 title; or

SB 1661 14
355 (e) Is abandoned property which is titled pursuant to
356 section 304.155 or section 304.157 and designated with the
357 words "salvage/abandoned property". The total cost of
358 repairs to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle shall not
359 include the cost of repairing, replacing, or reinstalling
360 inflatable safety restraints, tires, sound systems, or
361 damage as a result of hail, or any sales tax on parts or
362 materials to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle. For
363 purposes of this definition, "fair market value" means the
364 retail value of a motor vehicle as:
365 a. Set forth in a current edition of any nationally
366 recognized compilation of retail values, including automated
367 databases, or from publications commonly used by the
368 automotive and insurance industries to establish the values
369 of motor vehicles;
370 b. Determined pursuant to a market survey of
371 comparable vehicles with regard to condition and equipment;
372 and
373 c. Determined by an insurance company using any other
374 procedure recognized by the insurance industry, including
375 market surveys, that is applied by the company in a uniform
376 manner;
377 [(56)] (58) "School bus", any motor vehicle used
378 solely to transport students to or from school or to
379 transport students to or from any place for educational
380 purposes;
381 [(57)] (59) "Scrap processor", a business that,
382 through the use of fixed or mobile equipment, flattens,
383 crushes, or otherwise accepts motor vehicles and vehicle
384 parts for processing or transportation to a shredder or
385 scrap metal operator for recycling;

SB 1661 15
386 [(58)] (60) "Shuttle bus", a motor vehicle used or
387 maintained by any person, firm, or corporation as an
388 incidental service to transport patrons or customers of the
389 regular business of such person, firm, or corporation to and
390 from the place of business of the person, firm, or
391 corporation providing the service at no fee or charge.
392 Shuttle buses shall not be registered as buses or as
393 commercial motor vehicles;
394 [(59)] (61) "Special mobile equipment", every self-
395 propelled vehicle not designed or used primarily for the
396 transportation of persons or property and incidentally
397 operated or moved over the highways, including farm
398 equipment, implements of husbandry, road construction or
399 maintenance machinery, ditch-digging apparatus, stone
400 crushers, air compressors, power shovels, cranes, graders,
401 rollers, well-drillers and wood-sawing equipment used for
402 hire, asphalt spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders,
403 ditchers, leveling graders, finished machines, motor
404 graders, road rollers, scarifiers, earth-moving carryalls,
405 scrapers, drag lines, concrete pump trucks, rock-drilling
406 and earth-moving equipment. This enumeration shall be
407 deemed partial and shall not operate to exclude other such
408 vehicles which are within the general terms of this section;
409 [(60)] (62) "Specially constructed motor vehicle", a
410 motor vehicle which shall not have been originally
411 constructed under a distinctive name, make, model or type by
412 a manufacturer of motor vehicles. The term specially
413 constructed motor vehicle includes kit vehicles;
414 [(61)] (63) "Stinger-steered combination", a truck
415 tractor-semitrailer wherein the fifth wheel is located on a
416 drop frame located behind and below the rearmost axle of the
417 power unit;

SB 1661 16
418 [(62)] (64) "Tandem axle", a group of two or more
419 axles, arranged one behind another, the distance between the
420 extremes of which is more than forty inches and not more
421 than ninety-six inches apart;
422 [(63)] (65) "Towaway trailer transporter combination",
423 a combination of vehicles consisting of a trailer
424 transporter towing unit and two trailers or semitrailers,
425 with a total weight that does not exceed twenty-six thousand
426 pounds; and in which the trailers or semitrailers carry no
427 property and constitute inventory property of a
428 manufacturer, distributer, or dealer of such trailers or
429 semitrailers;
430 [(64)] (66) "Tractor", "truck tractor" or "truck-
431 tractor", a self-propelled motor vehicle designed for
432 drawing other vehicles, but not for the carriage of any load
433 when operating independently. When attached to a
434 semitrailer, it supports a part of the weight thereof;
435 [(65)] (67) "Trailer", any vehicle without motive
436 power designed for carrying property or passengers on its
437 own structure and for being drawn by a self-propelled
438 vehicle, except those running exclusively on tracks,
439 including a semitrailer or vehicle of the trailer type so
440 designed and used in conjunction with a self-propelled
441 vehicle that a considerable part of its own weight rests
442 upon and is carried by the towing vehicle. The term trailer
443 shall not include cotton trailers as defined in this section
444 and shall not include manufactured homes as defined in
445 section 700.010;
446 [(66)] (68) "Trailer transporter towing unit", a power
447 unit that is not used to carry property when operating in a
448 towaway trailer transporter combination;

SB 1661 17
449 [(67)] (69) "Truck", a motor vehicle designed, used,
450 or maintained for the transportation of property;
451 [(68)] (70) "Truck-tractor semitrailer-semitrailer", a
452 combination vehicle in which the two trailing units are
453 connected with a B-train assembly which is a rigid frame
454 extension attached to the rear frame of a first semitrailer
455 which allows for a fifth-wheel connection point for the
456 second semitrailer and has one less articulation point than
457 the conventional A-dolly connected truck-tractor semitrailer-
458 trailer combination;
459 [(69)] (71) "Truck-trailer boat transporter
460 combination", a boat transporter combination consisting of a
461 straight truck towing a trailer using typically a ball and
462 socket connection with the trailer axle located
463 substantially at the trailer center of gravity rather than
464 the rear of the trailer but so as to maintain a downward
465 force on the trailer tongue;
466 [(70)] (72) "Used parts dealer", a business that buys
467 and sells used motor vehicle parts or accessories, but not
468 including a business that sells only new, remanufactured or
469 rebuilt parts. Business does not include isolated sales at
470 a swap meet of less than three days;
471 [(71)] (73) "Utility vehicle", any motorized vehicle
472 manufactured and used exclusively for off-highway use which
473 is more than fifty inches but no more than eighty inches in
474 width, measured from outside of tire rim to outside of tire
475 rim, with an unladen dry weight of three thousand five
476 hundred pounds or less, traveling on four or six wheels, to
477 be used primarily for landscaping, lawn care, or maintenance
478 purposes;
479 [(72)] (74) "Vanpool", any van or other motor vehicle
480 used or maintained by any person, group, firm, corporation,

SB 1661 18
481 association, city, county or state agency, or any member
482 thereof, for the transportation of not less than eight nor
483 more than forty-eight employees, per motor vehicle, to and
484 from their place of employment; however, a vanpool shall not
485 be included in the definition of the term bus or commercial
486 motor vehicle as defined in this section, nor shall a
487 vanpool driver be deemed a chauffeur as that term is defined
488 by section 303.020; nor shall use of a vanpool vehicle for
489 ride-sharing arrangements, recreational, personal, or
490 maintenance uses constitute an unlicensed use of the motor
491 vehicle, unless used for monetary profit other than for use
492 in a ride-sharing arrangement;
493 [(73)] (75) "Vehicle", any mechanical device on
494 wheels, designed primarily for use, or used, on highways,
495 except motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, vehicles
496 propelled or drawn by horses or human power, or vehicles
497 used exclusively on fixed rails or tracks, or cotton
498 trailers or motorized wheelchairs operated by handicapped
499 persons;
500 [(74)] (76) "Wrecker" or "tow truck", any emergency
501 commercial vehicle equipped, designed and used to assist or
502 render aid and transport or tow disabled or wrecked vehicles
503 from a highway, road, street or highway rights-of-way to a
504 point of storage or repair, including towing a replacement
505 vehicle to replace a disabled or wrecked vehicle;
506 [(75)] (77) "Wrecker or towing service", the act of
507 transporting, towing or recovering with a wrecker, tow
508 truck, rollback or car carrier any vehicle not owned by the
509 operator of the wrecker, tow truck, rollback or car carrier
510 for which the operator directly or indirectly receives
511 compensation or other personal gain.

SB 1661 19
1 301.092. 1. It shall be unlawful for a resident of
2 this state with a Missouri residence address, as defined in
3 section 301.010, to title and register a motor vehicle in
4 another state with the intent to circumvent the motor
5 vehicle titling and registration requirements of this
6 chapter.
7 2. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that any
8 motor vehicle owned and operated by a resident of this state
9 with a Missouri residence address shall be subject to the
10 titling and registration requirements of this chapter and
11 that the owner shall be responsible for paying all
12 applicable Missouri fees and taxes for such motor vehicle.
13 3. The following factors shall be considered when
14 determining whether a Missouri resident intended to
15 circumvent the titling and registration requirements of this
16 chapter by titling and registering the motor vehicle in
17 another state:
18 (1) The person has a Missouri driver's license with a
19 Missouri residence address;
20 (2) The resident files Missouri state income taxes as
21 a resident of Missouri or has a Missouri tax liability;
22 (3) The Missouri resident resides in Missouri for at
23 least six months and one day;
24 (4) The Missouri resident was the initial purchaser of
25 the motor vehicle;
26 (5) The Missouri resident operates or stores the motor
27 vehicle in Missouri; and
28 (6) The Missouri resident has insured the motor
29 vehicle.
30 4. Vehicles, excluding recreational vehicles, weighing
31 more than fifty-four thousand pounds as well as apportioned
32 plates are exempt from this section.

SB 1661 20
33 5. (1) If the department determines that a Missouri
34 resident has violated the provisions of this section and
35 failed to title and register a motor vehicle required to be
36 titled and registered under this chapter, the department
37 shall notify the Missouri resident in writing that:
38 (a) He or she is required to obtain a Missouri
39 certificate of title and registration for the motor vehicle
40 and pay all taxes and fees for titling and registration owed
41 for the motor vehicle no later than ninety days from the
42 date of the notice; and
43 (b) Failure to pay such taxes shall result in a five-
44 hundred-dollar penalty.
45 (2) If the Missouri resident fails to comply with
46 paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection
47 within the specified time, the department shall suspend the
48 Missouri resident's driver's license until all taxes and
49 fees for titling and registration are paid in full including
50 any penalties to comply with Missouri law.
1 301.093. 1. It shall be unlawful for a resident of
2 this state with a Missouri residence address, as defined in
3 section 301.010, to title and register a motor vehicle under
4 a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation
5 that is operating as a shell entity in another state, with
6 the intent to circumvent the motor vehicle titling and
7 registration requirements of this chapter.
8 2. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that any
9 motor vehicle owned and operated by a resident of this state
10 with a Missouri residence address shall be subject to the
11 titling and registration requirements of this chapter and
12 that the owner shall be responsible for paying all
13 applicable Missouri fees and taxes for such motor vehicle.

SB 1661 21
14 3. The following factors shall be considered when
15 determining whether a partnership, limited liability
16 company, or corporation is a shell entity for purposes of
17 this section:
18 (1) The partnership, limited liability company, or
19 corporation lacks a specific business activity or purpose;
20 (2) The partnership, limited liability company, or
21 corporation fails to maintain a physical location in the
22 state where the motor vehicle is titled and registered;
23 (3) The partnership, limited liability company, or
24 corporation has a Missouri income tax filing or has a
25 Missouri tax liability;
26 (4) The partnership, limited liability company, or
27 corporation fails to employ an individual person or persons
28 or fails to provide employees with Internal Revenue Service
29 Form W-2 wage and tax statements; or
30 (5) The partnership, limited liability company, or
31 corporation fails to file a federal tax return or fails to
32 file a required state tax return in the state where the
33 motor vehicle is titled and registered.
34 4. The following factors shall be considered when
35 determining whether a Missouri resident intended to
36 circumvent the titling and registration requirements of this
37 chapter by titling and registering the motor vehicle under a
38 shell entity:
39 (1) The person has a Missouri driver's license with a
40 Missouri residence address;
41 (2) The individual with the shell company files
42 Missouri state income taxes as a resident of Missouri or has
43 a Missouri tax liability;
44 (3) The Missouri resident under the shell company was
45 the initial purchaser of the motor vehicle;

SB 1661 22
46 (4) The Missouri resident operates or stores the motor
47 vehicle in Missouri;
48 (5) The Missouri resident or shell company owner has
49 insured the motor vehicle; and
50 (6) The Missouri resident resides in Missouri for at
51 least six months and one day.
52 5. Vehicles, excluding recreational vehicles, weighing
53 more than fifty-four thousand pounds as well as apportioned
54 plates are exempt from this section.
55 6. (1) If the department determines that a Missouri
56 resident under the shell company has violated the provisions
57 of this section and failed to title and register a motor
58 vehicle required to be titled and registered under this
59 chapter, the department shall notify the Missouri resident
60 in writing that:
61 (a) He or she is required to obtain a Missouri
62 certificate of title and registration for the motor vehicle
63 and pay all taxes and fees for titling and registration owed
64 for the motor vehicle no later than ninety days from the
65 date of the notice; and
66 (b) Failure to pay such taxes shall result in a five-
67 hundred-dollar penalty.
68 (2) If the Missouri resident fails to comply with
69 paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection
70 within the specified time, the department shall suspend the
71 Missouri resident's driver's license until all taxes and
72 fees for titling and registration are paid in full including
73 any penalties to comply with Missouri law.
1 301.094. 1. A Missouri resident who willfully makes a
2 false statement in regard to the purchase of a motor vehicle
3 that is subject to fees and taxes for titling and
4 registration under this chapter, or who willfully attempts

SB 1661 23
5 in any manner to evade payment of the fees and taxes
6 required under this chapter, is guilty of a fraudulent
7 practice and shall be assessed a fine equal to seventy-five
8 percent of the amount of the unpaid fees and taxes and shall
9 be required to pay all applicable fees and taxes at the time
10 the motor vehicle is titled and registered.
11 2. The department may use the motorist insurance
12 identification database to identify and determine the
13 ownership of any motor vehicle not properly titled and
14 registered in the state as required by law. If through the
15 department's investigation it is determined the owner of the
16 motor vehicle is not in compliance with this chapter, the
17 department may impose a penalty on the owner of the motor
18 vehicle in the amount of five hundred dollars.
19 3. (1) If the department determines that a Missouri
20 resident has violated the provisions of this section and
21 failed to title and register a motor vehicle required to be
22 titled and registered under this chapter, the department
23 shall notify the Missouri resident in writing that:
24 (a) He or she is required to obtain a Missouri
25 certificate of title and registration for the motor vehicle
26 and pay all taxes and fees for titling and registration owed
27 for the motor vehicle no later than sixty days from the date
28 of the notice; and
29 (b) Failure to pay such taxes shall result in a five-
30 hundred-dollar penalty.
31 (2) If the Missouri resident fails to comply with
32 paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection
33 within the specified time, the department shall suspend the
34 Missouri resident's driver's license until all taxes and
35 fees for titling and registration are paid in full including
36 any penalties to comply with Missouri law.

SB 1661 24
37 4. If during an investigation under this section the
38 department finds no appropriate fees and taxes were paid
39 when a motor vehicle was purchased, the owner shall pay all
40 appropriate fees, taxes, and penalties to comply with
41 Missouri law.
42 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section,
43 upon making a record of the department's actions and upon
44 reasonable cause shown, the director may waive or reduce any
45 penalty imposed under this section.
✓